Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.02
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that, for Nebraska to compete effectively in the world, it must have an educated and productive work force. In order to have an educated and productive work force, it must prepare its children to learn, and in order to do so the children must be well-nourished. The Legislature further finds that school breakfast and lunch programs are integral parts of Nebraska's educational system and that every student deserves access to healthy food during the school day.

Laws 2000, LB 26, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 79-10,137;

Laws 2026, LB966, § 2.
July 18, 2026